Vermont, session 2025-2026, H915.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. chapter 53 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 53. BEVERAGE CONTAINERS; DEPOSIT-REDEMPTION
SYSTEM
§ 1521. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Beverage” means beer or other malt beverages and mineral waters,
mixed wine drink, soda water and carbonated soft drinks in liquid form and
intended for human consumption. “Beverage” also means liquor and ready-to-
drink spirits beverage.
(2) “Biodegradable material” means material that is capable of being
broken down by bacteria into basic elements. [Repealed.]
(3) “Container” means the individual, and separate, bottle, can, or jar, or
carton composed of glass, aluminum or other metal, paper, plastic polyethylene
terephthalate, high density polyethylene, or any combination of those
materials, and containing a consumer product beverage. This definition shall
does not include containers made of biodegradable material beverage
containers with a volume greater than three liters.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 2 of 40
2026
(4) “Dealer” means any person, including any operator of a vending
machine or retailer, who engages in the sale of beverages in beverage
containers to consumers in the State.
(5) “Deposit initiator” means the first distributor or manufacturer to
collect the deposit on a beverage container sold to any person within the State.
If no person initiates a deposit, the first distributor in the State shall be the
deposit initiator.
(6) “Distributor” means every person who engages in the sale of
consumer products beverages in containers to a dealer in this State, including
any manufacturer who engages in such sales. Any dealer or retailer who sells,
at the retail level, beverages in containers without having purchased them from
a person otherwise classified as a distributor shall be is a distributor.
(7) “Fair compensation” means the compensation from the producer
responsibility organization to the point of redemption in the amount that covers
the point of redemption’s reasonable costs of operating redemption services
and a reasonable rate of return.
(5)(8) “Manufacturer” means every person bottling, canning, packing, or
otherwise filling containers for sale to distributors or dealers.
(9) “Mixed wine drink” means a beverage containing wine and more
than 15 percent added plain, carbonated, or sparkling water and that contains
added natural or artificial blended material, such as fruit juices, flavors,
flavoring, adjuncts, coloring, or preservatives; a beverage that contains not
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 3 of 40
2026
more than 16 percent alcohol by volume; or another similar product marketed
as a wine cooler.
(10) “Point of redemption” means a location included in the plan
adopted under section 1532 of this title that redeems beverage containers under
this chapter. A point of redemption includes manually sorting containers,
mechanically sorting containers, and bag drops.
(11) “Point of redemption with immediate return of deposit” means a
point of redemption that immediately provides a person with a deposit when a
beverage container is presented for redemption.
(6)(12) “Recycling” means the process of sorting, cleansing, treating,
and reconstituting waste and other discarded materials for the purpose of
reusing the materials in the same or altered form.
(7)(13) “Redemption center” means a store or other location where any
person may, during normal business hours, redeem the amount of the deposit
for any empty beverage container labeled or certified pursuant to section 1524
of this title.
(14) “Redemption rate” means the number of beverage containers
redeemed for the deposit divided by the number of beverage containers sold
and may not include in its calculation any unredeemed beverage containers
collected or processed by municipal or other recycling programs.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 4 of 40
2026
(15) “Retailer” means a store or other licensed entity, including vending
machines, where containers are sold at the retail level for off-premise
consumption.
(8)(16) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
(9) “Mixed wine drink” means a beverage containing wine and more
than 15 percent added plain, carbonated, or sparkling water and that contains
added natural or artificial blended material, such as fruit juices, flavors,
flavoring, adjuncts, coloring, or preservatives; that contains not more than
16 percent alcohol by volume; or other similar product marketed as a wine
cooler.
(10)(17) “Liquor” means spirits as defined in 7 V.S.A. § 2.
§ 1522. BEVERAGE CONTAINERS; DEPOSIT
(a) Except with respect to beverage containers that contain liquor, a deposit
of not less than five cents shall be paid by the consumer on each beverage
container sold at the retail level and refunded to the consumer upon return of
the empty beverage container. With respect to beverage containers of volume
greater than 50 ml. that contain liquor, a deposit of 15 cents shall be paid by
the consumer on each beverage container sold at the retail level and refunded
to the consumer upon return of the empty beverage container. The difference
between liquor bottle deposits collected and refunds made is hereby retained
by the Liquor Control Enterprise Fund for administration of this subsection.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 5 of 40
2026
(b) A retailer or a person operating a redemption center who redeems
beverage containers shall be reimbursed by the manufacturer or distributor of
such deposit initiator of the beverage containers in an amount that is three and
one-half four and one-half cents per container for containers of beverage
brands that are part of a commingling program and four five cents per
container for containers of beverage brands that are not part of a commingling
program. Beginning on March 1, 2029, a retailer or a person operating a
redemption center shall be reimbursed for beverage containers that are covered
by a stewardship plan approved by the Secretary under this chapter according
to the fair compensation requirements of the plan.
* * *
(d) Containers shall be redeemed during no fewer than 40 hours per week
during the regular operating hours of the establishment. [Repealed.]
§ 1522a. RULES
The Secretary may adopt rules, in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25,
necessary for the administration of this chapter. These rules may include the
following:
(1) Provisions to ensure that beverage containers not labeled in
accordance with section 1524 of this title are not redeemed.
(2) Provisions to ensure that beverage containers are commingled.
(3) Administrative penalties for the failure by a redemption center or
retailer to remove beverage containers that are not labeled prior to pickup by a
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 6 of 40
2026
distributor or manufacturer. Penalties may include nonpayment of the deposit
and handling fee established under section 1522 of this title for a reasonable
period of time and for the number of beverage containers that were not labeled.
(4) Any other provision that may be necessary for the implementation of
this chapter. [Repealed.]
§ 1523. ACCEPTANCE OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
(a) Except as provided in section 1522 of this title:
(1) A retailer shall not refuse to accept from any person any empty
beverage containers, labeled in accordance with section 1524 of this title, of
the kind, size, and brand sold by the retailer, or and a retailer or a redemption
center shall not refuse to pay to that a person the refund value of a beverage
container as established by section 1522 of this title, except as provided in
subsection (b) subsections (b) or (c) of this section.
(2) A manufacturer or distributor may shall not refuse to pick up from a
retailer that sells its product or a person operating a certified redemption center
any empty beverage containers, labeled in accordance with section 1524 of this
title, of the kind, size, and brand sold by the manufacturer or distributor, or
refuse to pay the retailer or a person operating a redemption center the refund
value of a beverage container as established by section 1522 of this title.
(b) A retailer, with the prior approval of the Secretary, may refuse to
redeem beverage containers if a redemption center or centers are established
that serve the public need.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 7 of 40
2026
(c) A retailer or a person operating a redemption center may refuse to
redeem beverage containers that are not clean, or are broken, and shall not
redeem beverage containers that are not labeled in accordance with
section 1524 of this title.
* * *
§ 1524. LABELING
(a)(1) Every beverage container sold or offered for sale at retail in this State
shall clearly indicate by embossing or on the normal product label, imprinting
on the normal product label, or in the case of a metal beverage container on the
top of the container, other approved method secured to the container the word
“Vermont” or the letters “VT” and the refund value of the container in not less
than one-eighth inch type size or such other alternate indications as may be
approved by the Secretary.
(2) The label shall be on the top lid of the beverage container, the side of
the beverage container, or in a clearly visible location on the beverage
container. This subsection does not prohibit including names or abbreviations
of other states with deposit legislation comparable to this chapter.
(b) The Commissioner of Liquor and Lottery may allow, in the case of
liquor bottles, a conspicuous, adhesive sticker to be attached to indicate the
deposit information required in subsection (a) of this section, provided that the
size, placement, and adhesive qualities of the sticker are as approved by the
Commissioner. The stickers shall be affixed to the bottles by the
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 8 of 40
2026
manufacturer, except that liquor that is sold in the State in quantities less than
100 cases per year may have stickers affixed by personnel employed by the
Division of Liquor Control.
(c) This section shall not apply to permanently labeled beverage containers
Every beverage container sold or offered for sale in the State shall contain a
Universal Product Code and a barcode displayed on the container.
* * *
§ 1527. PENALTY REDEMPTION OF LIQUOR BOTTLES
A person who violates a provision of this chapter shall be fined not more
than $1,000.00 for each violation Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter to the contrary, redemption of beverage containers of volume greater
than 50 ml that contain liquor shall be subject to the following requirements:
(1) Deposit. Beverage containers subject to this section shall have a
deposit of 15 cents on each container sold at the retail level and returned to the
consumer upon return of the empty beverage container.
(2) Handling fee. Distributors of beverage containers subject to this
section shall pay a point of redemption that redeems a beverage container four
and one-half cents per container.
(3) Redemption. A retailer shall not refuse to accept beverage
containers subject to this section or refuse to pay a person the refund value
established by subdivision (1) of this section for any container unless the
container is not clean, broken, or has an exemption issued by the Secretary.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 9 of 40
2026
The Department of Liquor and Lottery shall not refuse to pick up empty
beverage containers subject to this section, pay the refund value, or pay the
handling fee to a retailer or redemption center subject to this section.
(4) Coordination with producer responsibility organization. The
Department of Liquor and Lottery may coordinate with and compensate the
producer responsibility organization to collect beverages containers subject to
this section at points of redemption that are a part of the collection plan
developed by the producer responsibility organization. Containers collected at
these points of redemption shall not be subject to the handling fee established
by subdivision (2) of this section.
(5) Performance goals and reporting. The Department of Liquor and
Lottery shall be subject to the redemption rate goals established in section
1534 of this title for beverage containers containing liquor. Beginning on
January 15, 2027, and annually thereafter, the Commissioner of Liquor and
Lottery shall report to the Secretary of Natural Resources:
(A) the amount and tonnage of liquor bottles that the Department of
Liquor and Lottery collected in the previous calendar year; and
(B) the redemption rate for liquor bottles in the previous calendar
year.
* * *
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 10 of 40
2026
§ 1529. REDEMPTION CENTER CERTIFICATION
A person operating a redemption center may shall obtain a certification
from the Secretary. A redemption center certification shall include the
following:
(1) Specification of the name and location of the facility;.
(2) If the certified redemption center redeems more than 250,000
containers per year, a requirement that the certified redemption center shall
participate in an approved commingling agreement; and
(3) Additional conditions, requirements, and restrictions as the Secretary
may deem necessary to implement the requirements of this chapter. This may
shall include requirements concerning reporting, recording, and inspections of
the operation of the site.
§ 1530. ABANDONED BEVERAGE CONTAINER DEPOSITS
(a) As used in this section, “deposit initiator” means the first distributor or
manufacturer to collect the deposit on a beverage container sold to any person
within the State.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, every deposit
initiator shall report to the Secretary of Natural Resources and the
Commissioner of Taxes. The report shall be submitted on or before the 25th
day of the calendar month succeeding the quarter ending on the last day of
March, June, September, and December each year. The deposit initiator shall
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 11 of 40
2026
submit the report on a form provided by the Commissioner of Taxes. The
report shall include:
(1) the number of beverage containers sold in the preceding quarter and
the number of beverage containers returned in the preceding quarter;
(2) the amount of beverage container deposits received by the deposit
initiator;
(3) the amount of refund payments made in the preceding quarter; and
(4) any additional information required by the Commissioner of Taxes.
(c)(b)(1) On or before January 1, 2020, and quarterly thereafter, at the time
a report is filed pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, each deposit initiator
shall remit to the Commissioner of Taxes any abandoned beverage container
deposits from the preceding quarter. The amount of abandoned beverage
container deposits for a quarter is the amount equal to the amount of deposits
that the deposit initiator collected in the quarter less the amount of the total
refund value paid out by the deposit initiator for beverage containers during the
quarter.
(2) In any calendar quarter, the deposit initiator may submit to the
Commissioner of Taxes a request for reimbursement of refunds paid under this
chapter that exceed the amount of deposits collected in the quarter. The
Commissioner of Taxes shall pay a request for reimbursement under this
subdivision from the funds remitted to the Commissioner under subdivision (1)
of this subsection, provided that:
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 12 of 40
2026
(A) the Commissioner determines that the deposits collected by the
deposit initiator are insufficient to pay the refunds on returned beverage
containers; and
(B) a reimbursement paid by the Commissioner to the deposit
initiator shall not exceed the amount paid by the deposit initiator under
subdivision (1) of this subsection (c)(b) less amounts paid to the initiator
pursuant to this subdivision (2) in the previous four quarterly filings.
(3) Except as expressly provided otherwise in this chapter, all the
administrative provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 151, including those relating to
collection, enforcement, interest, and penalty charges, shall apply to the
remittance of abandoned beverage container deposits.
(4) A deposit initiator may within 60 days after the date of mailing of a
notice of deficiency, the date of a full or partial denial of a request for
reimbursement, or the date of an assessment petition the Commissioner of
Taxes in writing for a hearing and determination on the matter. The hearing
shall be subject to and governed by 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. Within 30 days after
a determination, an aggrieved deposit initiator may appeal a determination by
the Commissioner of Taxes to the Washington Superior Court or the Superior
Court of the county in which the deposit initiator resides or has a place of
business.
(5) Notwithstanding any appeal, upon finding that a deposit initiator has
failed to remit the full amount required by this chapter, the Commissioner of
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 13 of 40
2026
Taxes may treat any refund payment owed by the Commissioner to a deposit
initiator as if it were a payment received and may apply the payment in
accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 3112.
(d)(c) The Secretary of Natural Resources may prohibit the sale of a
beverage that is sold or distributed in the State by a deposit initiator who fails
to comply with the requirements of this chapter. The Secretary may allow the
sale of a beverage upon the deposit initiator’s coming into compliance with the
requirements of this chapter.
(e)(d) Data reported to the Secretary of Natural Resources and the
Commissioner of Taxes by a deposit initiator under this section shall be
confidential business information exempt from public inspection and copying
under 1 V.S.A. § 317(c)(9) but shall not be confidential return information
under 32 V.S.A. § 3102, provided that the Commissioner of Taxes may use
and disclose such information in summary or aggregated form that does not
directly or indirectly identify individual deposit initiators except to the
Secretary of Natural Resources in relation to the administration of this chapter.
§ 1531. MANUFACTURER AND DISTRIBUTOR PARTICIPATION IN
PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY ORGANIZATION
(a) No deposit initiator shall sell or distribute a beverage container in this
State without participating in a Secretary-approved producer responsibility
organization.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 14 of 40
2026
(b) On or before January 1, 2027, the deposit initiator of beverage
containers sold or distributed within the State shall apply to the Secretary to
form a producer responsibility organization to fulfill the requirements of
deposit initiators under this chapter.
(c) The Secretary may approve, for a period not longer than 10 years, the
producer responsibility organization, provided that:
(1) the producer responsibility organization or its subsidiary is registered
under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) as a nonprofit entity;
(2) the producer responsibility organization has the capacity to
administer the requirements of a stewardship plan required by section 1532 of
this title; and
(3) the producer responsibility organization does not create any
unreasonable barriers to joining the producer responsibility organization and
shall take into the consideration the needs of small manufacturers that do not
generate a significant volume of containers.
(d) After approval, the producer responsibility organization shall maintain a
website that identifies:
(1) the name and principal business address of each manufacturer or
distributor participating in the producer responsibility organization;
(2) the name of each beverage and the container size covered by the
stewardship plan; and
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 15 of 40
2026
(3) for each beverage container subject to the plan, a Universal Product
Code and a barcode shall be displayed on the container.
(e) The producer responsibility organization may charge fees to deposit
initiators to cover the costs of administration and implementation of this
chapter. Deposit initiators shall pay all fees required by the producer
responsibility organization and provide any data required by the producer
responsibility organization. If a deposit initiator fails to meet these
requirements, the producer responsibility organization may remove it from the
producer responsibility organization.
(f) If the producer responsibility organization fails to implement the
requirements of this chapter, the rules adopted by the Secretary, or an approved
stewardship plan, the Secretary may dissolve the producer responsibility
organization.
(g) If no producer responsibility organization is formed, the Secretary shall
either require the formation of the producer responsibility organization or
adopt and administer a plan that meets the requirements of section 1532 of this
title. If the Secretary administers the plan adopted under section 1532 of this
title, the Secretary shall charge each deposit initiator the costs of plan
administration, the Agency’s oversight costs, and a recycling market
development assessment of 25 percent of the plan’s total cost to be deposited
in the Solid Waste Management Assistance Account of the Waste Management
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 16 of 40
2026
Assistance Fund, for the purpose of providing grants to develop markets to
recycle materials.
(h) The producer responsibility organization shall reimburse the Secretary
for the costs of overseeing the administration of the program under this chapter
as follows:
(1) The Secretary shall annually provide an estimate of the costs of
overseeing the administration of the program to the producer responsibility
organization, including staff costs, compliance, and oversight of the system.
(2) The producer responsibility organization shall provide any
comments to the Secretary’s budget within 30 days following receipt. The
Agency of Natural Resources shall respond to all comments provided by the
producer responsibility organization and may make changes to its budget in
response to those comments. These comments and the responses shall be
provided to the General Assembly as a part of the Secretary’s budget.
(3) Reimbursement of Agency of Natural Resources costs under this
subsection shall be subject to the State budgeting process, and the producer
responsibility organization shall not be required to reimburse any Agency cost
unless that cost is approved as a part of the Agency’s budget.
(i) Manufacturers and distributors of liquor are exempt from the
requirements of this section and the requirement to implement a stewardship
plan under section 1532 of this title.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 17 of 40
2026
§ 1532. STEWARDSHIP PLAN; MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS
(a) Plan elements. On or before April 1, 2028, an approved producer
responsibility organization shall submit a stewardship plan to the Secretary. A
stewardship plan shall, at a minimum, meet all of the following requirements
of this section:
(1) Convenience of collection.
(A) A plan shall ensure that consumers have convenient opportunities
to redeem beverage containers. The plan shall take reasonable efforts to site
points of redemption equitably across all regions of the State to allow for
convenient and reasonable access of all Vermonters to redemption
opportunities. A plan shall document how redemption services will be
available to consumers as follows:
(i) at least three points of redemption per county, at least one of
which provides an immediate return of a deposit to a consumer;
(ii) at least one point of redemption per municipality with a
population of 7,000 or more persons that provides an immediate return of a
deposit to a consumer unless the Secretary determines that requiring an
immediate return of deposit would create an impediment to effective
redemption under the plan; and
(iii) how sites of redemption are or will be sited in areas with high
population density or located in centers designated under 24 V.S.A. chapter
76A.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 18 of 40
2026
(B) The producer responsibility organization may propose in its plan
to remove retail redemption locations required by subdivision 1523(a)(2) of
this title. When proposing to remove these retail locations, the producer
responsibility organization shall document how the location is adequately
served by other points of redemption. The Secretary shall not approve any
reduction that reduces the points of redemption below the levels required under
subdivisions (1)(A)(i) and (ii) of this subsection (a). The Secretary may
require additional points of redemption based on the location of proposed or
existing points of redemption, shopping patterns, and the convenience of
redeeming beverage containers.
(C) The producer responsibility organization may not use only
single-feed reverse vending machines or only mobile points of redemption as
the point of redemption to satisfy the requirement under subdivision (1)(A)(i)
of this subsection (a) except where the producer responsibility organization
documents that the population and retail density of the county is adequately
served by the use of these forms of collection.
(D) The producer responsibility organization shall ensure that points
of redemption have the operational capacity to redeem beverage containers.
This includes training on the use of equipment, providing service of equipment
in a reasonable time if there are issues, and providing pick-up of collected
containers from the point of redemption in a reasonable period from receiving
a request.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 19 of 40
2026
(2) Fair operation and compensation to redemption centers. The plan
shall satisfy all of the following requirements:
(A) The plan shall describe how all locations that redeem beverage
containers are fairly compensated for their participation in the collection
program provided that the producer responsibility organization shall pay each
location that redeems beverage containers:
(i) four and one-half cents per container for all other means of
redemption at a location; or
(ii) according to a separate compensation agreement negotiated
between a redemption location or a group of redemption locations that redeems
beverage containers and the producer responsibility organization.
(B) There shall not be barriers to the participation in the collection
program for a redemption center, except for restrictions that are authorized by
the Secretary.
(C) The plan shall describe how management and sorting of
containers at points of redemption is minimized. The plan shall document how
brand sorting will be eliminated at points of redemption.
(D) The plan shall describe how materials will be picked up from
points of redemption on a timely basis.
(E) The plan shall maximize the use of existing infrastructure, when
establishing points of redemption under subdivision (1) of this subsection (a).
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 20 of 40
2026
(F) Consistent with guidelines developed by the Secretary, the
producer responsibility organization shall use binding dispute resolution to
resolve any disputes that arise surrounding negotiation of separate
compensation agreements between the producer responsibility organization
and points of redemption. This process shall be implemented using a neutral
third-party decision maker agreed to by all parties.
(G) After the plan is effective for two years and six months, the
producer responsibility organization shall submit a report on fair compensation
to the Secretary. The report shall either describe how the producer
responsibility organization has adjusted compensation for points of redemption
or document why such an adjustment is not necessary.
(3) Redemption amount. The producer responsibility organization or a
point of redemption operating under the plan shall pay a person presenting a
beverage container for redemption the refund value of the beverage container
as established by section 1522 of this title.
(4) Collection location standards. All locations that provide for
redemption of beverage containers shall:
(A) provide timely redemption services that limit the need for
persons redeeming containers to wait for redemption services;
(B) be at sites that are secure, sufficiently lighted, and managed to
ensure the safety of persons redeeming containers at a location;
(C) be open and accepting beverage containers:
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 21 of 40
2026
(i) in the case of a fixed point of redemption, at least 35 hours per
week, including six consecutive hours on Saturday; or
(ii) in the case of a mobile point of redemption, at least 15 hours
per week, including at least four consecutive hours on Saturday; and
(D) comply with all applicable laws related to the collection,
transportation, and disposition of mandated recyclables.
(5) Education to consumers. The plan shall describe what education
efforts will be undertaken to increase the number of beverage containers
redeemed in the State.
(6) Consultation with stakeholders. The producer responsibility
organization shall consult with stakeholders on the development of the plan.
The plan shall include processes for regular consultation, which shall take
place not less than annually, with stakeholders, including the Agency,
redemption centers, municipal and private recycling organizations, bag drop
and reverse vending technology providers, and other stakeholders. Prior to
submitting a proposed plan to the Agency, the producer responsibility
organization shall allow the public to comment on the proposed plan. The
producer responsibility organization shall either make changes in response to
those comments or provide a written response on why the change was not
made to the stakeholders and the Agency.
(7) The Agency shall publish the proposed and final approved plan on
the Agency’s website.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 22 of 40
2026
(b) Reporting. At a frequency required by the Secretary but not less than
annually, the producer responsibility organization shall report the following to
the Secretary:
(1) the name, address, and business hours of each redemption center
participating in the approved stewardship plan and the number of redemption
centers added or removed from the plan over the preceding year;
(2) the amount, in containers and tons, and material type of beverage
containers redeemed under the plan and the redemption rate of beverage
containers;
(3) the location and amount of beverage container material that was
recycled and what products that beverage container material was recycled into;
(4) the carbon impacts associated with the administration of the
stewardship plan;
(5) the costs associated with administration of the stewardship plan,
including the costs of collection, management, and transportation of redeemed
containers and the amount received for commodities;
(6) a description of any improvements made in the reporting year to
increase ease and convenience for consumers to return beverage containers for
redemption;
(7) efforts taken by or on behalf of the manufacturer or distributor to
reduce environmental impacts throughout the product life cycle and to increase
reusability or recyclability at the end of the life cycle by material type;
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 23 of 40
2026
(8) efforts taken by or on behalf of the producer responsibility
organization to improve the environmental outcomes of the program by
improving operational efficiency, such as reduction of truck trips through
improved material handling or compaction or the increased use of refillable
containers in a local refilling system;
(9) a description and copies of educational materials and educational
strategies the producer responsibility organization uses for the purposes of this
program; and
(10) any additional information required by the Secretary.
(c) Review of stewardship plan.
(1) Within 90 days after receipt of a plan submitted under this section,
the Secretary shall review the plan and determine whether to approve the plan,
deny the plan, or require an amendment to the plan. The Secretary may amend
or add conditions to the plan as a part of the approval. The plan shall be
approved after concluding that the plan meets the criteria established in this
section and the elements of the plan will maximize diversion of recyclable
materials, provide convenience to users, and create a more circular economy.
If the plan is denied, the Secretary shall provide a basis for that denial and the
producer responsibility organization shall submit a revised plan addressing
these issues within 60 days following the notice of denial.
(2) At least six months prior to the expiration of the plan, the producer
responsibility organization shall submit a renewal to the stewardship plan.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 24 of 40
2026
Renewals shall address all elements considered in the original plan and shall be
considered in the same manner as an original plan. The Secretary shall issue a
final determination on an application for renewal not later than 90 days before
the expiration of the plan.
(3) The Secretary’s approval pursuant to this subsection shall be for a
period not greater than five years.
(d) Plan implementation. The producer responsibility organization shall
implement the approved plan on March 1, 2029.
(e) Revision of stewardship goals. If the producer responsibility
organization fails to meet the beverage container redemption rate in section
1534 of this title for all other beverage containers, the Secretary may require
the producer responsibility organization to implement activities to enhance the
rate of redemption, including additional public education and outreach,
additional redemption sites, or additional redemption opportunities.
§ 1533. PROGRAM AND FISCAL AUDIT
(a) Program audit. Beginning on October 1, 2033, and every five years
thereafter, the producer responsibility organization shall conduct an
independent third-party program audit of the operation of the stewardship plan.
The program audit shall examine how the product stewardship organization
compensates redemption centers as a part of its report. The audit shall make
recommendations to improve the operation of the collection program
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 25 of 40
2026
established by this chapter, including any recommendation to the
compensation structure for redemption centers.
(b) Fiscal audit. Beginning on October 1, 2030, and annually thereafter,
the producer responsibility organization shall conduct an independent third-
party fiscal audit of the program. The fiscal audit shall provide a transparent
fiscal analysis of the producer responsibility organization, its expenditures, the
number of beverage containers collected, and the amount of unclaimed
deposits. The audit shall also provide the redemption rate of beverage
containers redeemed in the State. The Secretary shall approve the audit results
and the redemption rate of beverage containers included in the audit.
(c) Submission to Secretary. The results of each audit required under
subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall be submitted to the Secretary for
purposes of reviewing performance of the stewardship plan and for oversight
of the requirements of this chapter.
§ 1534. BEVERAGE CONTAINER REDEMPTION RATE GOAL;
REPORT
(a) It is a goal of the State that the following minimum beverage container
redemption rates shall be satisfied by the specified dates:
(1) Beginning on July 1, 2030: 75 percent.
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2033: 80 percent.
(b)(1) Beginning on December 1, 2030, and annually thereafter, the
Secretary of Natural Resources shall submit to the House Committees on
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 26 of 40
2026
Environment and on Ways and Means and the Senate Committees on Natural
Resources and Energy and on Finance a written report containing the current
beverage container redemption rate in the State for the following two
categories of beverage containers:
(A) liquor bottles; and
(B) all other beverage containers.
(2) Each annual report submitted under subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall include a recommendation of whether the beverage container
deposit for either of the beverage container categories should be increased to
improve redemption of that category of beverage container.
§ 1535. RULEMAKING
The Secretary may adopt rules, in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25,
necessary for the administration of this chapter.
§ 1536. ANTITRUST; CONDUCT AUTHORIZED
(a) Activity authorized. A manufacturer, distributor, group of
manufacturers or distributors, or producer responsibility organization
implementing or participating in an approved collection plan under this chapter
for the collection, transport, processing, and management of beverage
containers is individually or jointly immune from liability for conduct under
State laws relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices, and
other regulation of trade or commerce under 9 V.S.A. chapter 63, subchapter 1
to the extent that the conduct is reasonably necessary to plan, implement, and
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 27 of 40
2026
comply with the producer responsibility organization’s chosen system for
beverage containers.
(b) Limitations on antitrust activity. Subsection (a) of this section shall not
apply to an agreement among manufacturers, distributors, groups of
manufacturers or distributors, retailers, wholesalers, or the producer
responsibility organization affecting the price of beverage containers or any
agreement restricting the geographic area in which or customers to whom
beverage containers shall be sold.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 1523 is amended to read:
§ 1523. ACCEPTANCE OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
(a) Except as provided in section 1522 of this title:
(1) A retailer shall not refuse to accept from any person any empty
beverage containers, labeled in accordance with section 1524 of this title, of
the kind, size, and brand sold by the retailer, and a retailer or a redemption
center shall not refuse to pay to that person the refund value of a beverage
container as established by section 1522 of this title, except as provided in
subsections (b) or (c) of this section.
(2) A manufacturer or distributor may The producer responsibility
organization shall not refuse to pick up from a retailer that sells its product or a
person operating a certified redemption center any point of redemption
included in the stewardship plan empty beverage containers, labeled in
accordance with section 1524 of this title, of the kind, size, and brand sold by
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 28 of 40
2026
the manufacturer or distributor, or refuse to pay the retailer or a person
operating a redemption center point of redemption the refund value of a
beverage container as established by section 1522 of this title.
(b)(1) A retailer, with the prior approval of the Secretary, may refuse to
redeem beverage containers if a redemption center or centers are established
that serve the public need stewardship plan that meets the requirements of
section 1532 of this title has been implemented by the producer responsibility
organization in the State and the retailer’s building is less than 5,000 square
feet.
(2) A manufacturer that sells directly to a consumer from a retail
location may refuse to redeem beverage containers if the retail location where
the manufacturer or distributor sells beverage containers is less than 5,000
square feet.
(c) A retailer or a person operating a redemption center may point of
redemption or producer responsibility organization shall refuse to redeem
beverage containers that are not clean or, are broken and shall not redeem
beverage containers that, are not labeled in accordance with section 1524 of
this title, were known to have been purchased out of State, have already been
redeemed, or are not registered with the producer responsibility organization
pursuant to subsection 1531(d) of this title.
* * *
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 29 of 40
2026
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 7714 is amended to read:
§ 7714. TYPE 3 PROCEDURES
(a) Purpose; scope.
(1) The purpose of this section is to establish the public notice and
comment requirements that the Department must follow when adopting general
permits, except for general permits governed by section 7712 of this chapter,
and when considering other permits listed in this section.
(2) The procedures under this section shall be known as Type 3
Procedures. This section governs each of the following:
(A) Each general permit issued pursuant to the Secretary’s authority
under this title other than a general permit subject to section 7712 of this
chapter. However, this section does not apply to a notice of intent under a
general permit.
(B) Issuance of a dam safety order under chapter 43 of this title,
except for an unsafe dam order under section 1095 of this title.
(C) An application or request for approval of:
(i) an aquatic nuisance control permit under chapter 50 of this
title;
(ii) a change in treatment for a public water supply under chapter
56 of this title;
(iii) a collection plan for mercury-containing lamps under section
7156 of this title;
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 30 of 40
2026
(iv) an individual plan for the collection and recycling of
electronic waste under section 7554 of this title;
(v) a primary battery stewardship plan under section 7586 of this
title;
(vi) a covered household products collection plan under section
7813 of this title; and
(vii) a stewardship plan required under chapter 53 of this title.
(b) Notice of application. The Secretary shall provide notice of an
administratively complete application through the environmental notice
bulletin.
(c) Notice of draft decision; comment period. The Secretary shall provide
notice of the draft decision through the environmental notice bulletin and shall
post the draft decision to the bulletin. The Secretary shall provide a public
comment period.
(d) Public meeting. The Secretary shall hold a public meeting whenever
any person files a written request for such a meeting. The Secretary otherwise
may hold a public meeting at his or her the Secretary’s discretion.
(e) Notice of final decision. The Secretary shall provide notice of the final
decision through the environmental notice bulletin and shall post the final
decision to the bulletin. The Secretary shall provide a response to comments.
Sec. 4. 10 V.S.A. § 1388 is amended to read:
§ 1388. CLEAN WATER FUND
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 31 of 40
2026
(a) There is created a special fund to be known as the Clean Water Fund to
be administered by the Secretary of Administration. The Fund shall consist of:
(1) revenues from the Property Transfer Tax surcharge established under
32 V.S.A. § 9602a;
(2) other gifts, donations, and impact fees received from any source,
public or private, dedicated for deposit into the Fund and approved by the
Secretary of Administration;
(3) the unclaimed beverage container deposits (escheats) remitted to the
State under chapter 53 of this title, except as follows:
(A) in State fiscal year 2030, the Secretary may transfer up to
$1,000,000.00 to the Solid Waste Management Assistance Account of the fund
created pursuant to section 6618 of this title for grants pursuant to subdivision
6618(b)(11) of this title;
(B) in State fiscal year 2031, the Secretary may transfer up to
$1,000,000.00 to the Solid Waste Management Assistance Account of the fund
created pursuant to section 6618 of this title for grants pursuant to subdivision
6618(b)(11) of this title;
(C) in State fiscal year 2032, the Secretary may transfer up to
$750,000.00 to the Solid Waste Management Assistance Account of the fund
created pursuant to section 6618 of this title for grants pursuant to subdivision
6618(b)(11) of this title; and
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 32 of 40
2026
(D) in State fiscal year 2033, the Secretary may transfer up to
$750,000.00 to the Solid Waste Management Assistance Account of the fund
created pursuant to section 6618 of this title for grants pursuant to subdivision
6618(b)(11) of this title;
(4) six percent of the revenues from the meals and rooms taxes imposed
under 32 V.S.A. chapter 225; and
(5) other revenues dedicated for deposit into the Fund by the General
Assembly.
(b) Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 7,
subchapter 5, unexpended balances and any earnings shall remain in the Fund
from year to year.
Sec. 5. 10 V.S.A. § 6618 is amended to read:
§ 6618. WASTE MANAGEMENT ASSISTANCE FUND
(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the
Waste Management Assistance Fund to be expended by the Secretary of
Natural Resources. The Fund shall have three accounts: one for Solid Waste
Management Assistance, one for Hazardous Waste Management Assistance,
and one for Electronic Waste Collection and Recycling Assistance. The
Hazardous Waste Management Assistance Account shall consist of a
percentage of the tax on hazardous waste under the provisions of 32 V.S.A.
chapter 237, as established by the Secretary; the toxics use reduction fees
under subsection 6628(j) of this title; and appropriations of the General
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 33 of 40
2026
Assembly. In no event shall the amount of the hazardous waste tax that is
deposited to the Hazardous Waste Management Assistance Account exceed
40 percent of the annual tax receipts. The Solid Waste Management
Assistance Account shall consist of the franchise tax on waste facilities
assessed under the provisions of 32 V.S.A. chapter 151, subchapter 13;
transfers from the Clean Water Fund; and appropriations of the General
Assembly. The Electronic Waste Collection and Recycling Account shall
consist of the program and implementation fees required under section 7553 of
this title. All balances in the Fund accounts at the end of any fiscal year shall
be carried forward and remain a part of the Fund accounts, except as provided
in subsection (e) of this section. Interest earned by the Fund shall be deposited
into the appropriate Fund account. Disbursements from the Fund accounts
shall be made by the State Treasurer on warrants drawn by the Commissioner
of Finance and Management.
(b) The Secretary may authorize disbursements from the Solid Waste
Management Assistance Account for the purpose of enhancing solid waste
management in the State in accordance with the adopted waste management
plan. This includes:
* * *
(11) The Secretary shall enter a grant agreement with the producer
responsibility organization approved under chapter 53 of this title for bottle bill
implementation. The grant shall be for four years and reimburse the cost of
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 34 of 40
2026
equipment and improvements to infrastructure documented by the producer
responsibility organization in its approved stewardship plan. Grants shall be
limited as follows: in fiscal year 2030, not more than $1,000,000.00; in fiscal
year 2031, not more than $1,000,000.00; in fiscal year 2032, not more than
$750,000.00; and in fiscal year 2033, not more than $750,000.00.
* * *
Sec. 6. AGENCY OF NATURAL RESOURCES REPORT;
STATUS OF IMPLEMENTATION OF STEWARDSHIP PLAN FOR
REDEMPTION OF BEVERAGE CONTAINERS
On or before January 1, 2030, the Secretary of Natural Resources shall
submit to the House Committee on Environment and the Senate Committee on
Natural Resources and Energy a report on the status of the implementation of a
stewardship plan for the redemption of beverage containers by the producer
responsibility organization required under 10 V.S.A. chapter 53. The report
shall:
(1) summarize the approved stewardship plan for redemption of
beverage containers, including how the plan complied with the statutory
requirements for convenience of collection for consumers and fair
compensation for points of redemption;
(2) describe how the producer responsibility organization has updated or
plans to implement redemption technologies to modernize redemption services
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 35 of 40
2026
and improve the convenience and efficiency of redemption services in the
State; and
(3) provide any other information that the Secretary deems relevant to
the implementation and administration of the stewardship plan for redemption
of beverage containers.
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 1532(a)(2) is amended to read:
(2) Fair operation and compensation to redemption centers. The plan
shall satisfy all of the following requirements:
(A) The plan shall describe how all locations that redeem beverage
containers are fairly compensated for their participation in the collection
program provided that the producer responsibility organization shall pay each
location that redeems beverage containers:
(i) four and one-half cents per container for all other means of
redemption at a location; or
(ii) according to a separate compensation agreement negotiated
between a redemption location or a group of redemption locations that redeems
beverage containers and the producer responsibility organization. The
producer responsibility organization and a redemption location or groups of
redemption locations shall negotiate how the redemption location or locations
shall be compensated for collection of containers under the plan.
* * *
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 36 of 40
2026
Sec. 8. REPEALS
(a) In Sec. 1 of this act, 10 V.S.A. § 1529 (redemption center certification)
is repealed on March 1, 2029.
(b) In Sec. 5 of this act, 10 V.S.A. § 6618(b)(11) (producer responsibility
implementation grants) is repealed on October 1, 2033.
(c) 10 V.S.A. § 1528 (beverage registration) is repealed on March 1, 2029.
Sec. 9. 10 V.S.A. § 7182 is amended to read:
§ 7182. SALE OF COVERED HOUSEHOLD HAZARDOUS PRODUCTS;
STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION REGISTRATION;
MANUFACTURER REGISTRATION
* * *
(b) Stewardship organization registration requirements.
(1) On or before July 1, 2025, a stewardship organization shall file a
registration form with the Secretary. The Secretary shall provide the
registration form to the stewardship organization. The registration form shall
include:
(A) a description of how the stewardship organization meets the
requirements of subsection 7184(b) of this title, including any reasonable
requirements for participation in the stewardship organization; and
(B) the name, address, and contact information of a person for a
nonmember manufacturer to contact regarding how to participate in the
stewardship organization to satisfy the requirements of this chapter.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 37 of 40
2026
(2) Beginning on July 1, 2026 2028, and annually thereafter, a
stewardship organization shall renew its registration with the Secretary. A
renewal registration shall include the following:
(A) a list of the manufacturers participating in the stewardship
organization;
(B) a list of the brands of each manufacturer participating in the
stewardship organization;
(C) a list of the covered household hazardous products of each
manufacturer participating in the stewardship organization;
(D) the name, address, and contact information of a person
responsible for ensuring compliance with this chapter;
(E) a description of how the stewardship organization meets the
requirements of subsection 7184(b) of this title, including any reasonable
requirements for participation in the stewardship organization; and
(F) the name, address, and contact information of a person for a
nonmember manufacturer to contact regarding how to participate in the
stewardship organization to satisfy the requirements of this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 10. 10 V.S.A. § 7183 is amended to read:
§ 7183. COLLECTION PLANS
(a) Collection plan required. On or before July 1, 2026, any stewardship
organization registered with the Secretary as representing manufacturers of
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 38 of 40
2026
covered household hazardous products shall coordinate and submit to the
Secretary for review one collection plan for all manufacturers a collection plan
that addresses how covered household hazardous products enrolled in that plan
meet the requirements of this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 11. 10 V.S.A. § 7187 is amended to read:
§ 7187. AGENCY RESPONSIBILITIES
(a) Review and approve collection plans. The Secretary shall review and
approve or deny collection plans submitted under section 7183 of this title
according to the public notice and comment requirements of section 7714 of
this title.
* * *
(h) Reimbursement of Agency oversight costs. The stewardship
organization shall reimburse the Secretary for the costs of overseeing the
administration of the program under this chapter as follows:
(1) The Secretary shall annually provide an estimate of the costs of
overseeing the administration of the household hazardous products collection
program to the stewardship organization, including staff costs, compliance, and
oversight of the system.
(2) The stewardship organization shall provide any comments to the
Secretary’s budget within 30 days following receipt. The Agency of Natural
Resources shall respond to all comments provided by the stewardship
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 39 of 40
2026
organization and may make changes to its budget in response to those
comments. These comments and the responses shall be provided to the
General Assembly as a part of the Secretary’s budget.
(3) Reimbursement of Agency of Natural Resources costs under this
subsection shall be subject to the State budgeting process, and the stewardship
organization shall not be required to reimburse any Agency cost unless that
cost is approved as a part of the Agency’s budget.
Sec. 12. TRANSITION
(a) Beginning on July 1, 2027, a group of manufacturers may register a
new stewardship organization covering a class of household hazardous
products and their packages when collected together. There shall be only one
stewardship organization per class of products; however, there may be more
than one stewardship program administering the requirements of 10 V.S.A.
chapter 164B.
(b) Beginning on July 1, 2027, an approved stewardship organization
covering a class of household hazardous products may submit a plan for the
products covered by that approved stewardship organization. In addition to the
elements covered by 10 V.S.A. § 7183, the plan shall describe any transition
from the previously approved plan. The Secretary shall have 120 days to
review and approve or reject any plan submitted under this section. That plan
shall take effect on or before July 1, 2030.
VT LEG #390250 v.1

No. 158 Page 40 of 40
2026
Sec. 13. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, except that:
(1) in Sec. 1, 10 V.S.A. § 1524(c) (requiring a UPC label on containers)
shall take effect on July 1, 2027;
(2) in Sec. 1, 10 V.S.A. § 1531(a) (prohibiting sale or distribution
without participating in the producer responsibility organization) shall take
effect on July 1, 2027;
(3) Sec. 2 (acceptance of beverage containers after plan implementation)
shall take effect on March 1, 2029;
(4) in Sec. 5, 10 V.S.A. § 6618(b)(11) (capital implementation grants)
shall take effect on July 1, 2029; and
(5) Sec. 7 (repeal of handling fees under the beverage container
stewardship plan) shall take effect on July 1, 2030.
Date Governor signed bill: June 17, 2026
VT LEG #390250 v.1